District of Columbia statutes.
32-1121

Criminal penalties.

(a)

An employer who willfully violates a rule promulgated or order issued pursuant to § 32-1108, § 32-1109, § 32-1110, or § 32-1111 or any other rule promulgated pursuant to this chapter, and that violation causes death to an employee, the employer, shall, upon conviction, be subject to a fine of not more than $10,000, imprisonment for not more than 6 months, or both. If the conviction is for a second violation of a rule or order referenced in this section, the employer shall be fined not more than $20,000, imprisoned for not more than 1 year, or both.

(b)

A person who gives advance notice of an inspection to be conducted under this chapter, without authority from the Mayor, shall, upon conviction, be fined not more than $1,000, imprisoned for not more than 6 months, or both.

(c)

Whoever knowingly makes a false statement, representation, or certification in an application, record, report, plan, or other document filed or required to be maintained pursuant to this chapter shall, upon conviction, be fined not more than $10,000, imprisoned for not more than 6 months, or both.

(d)

Prosecutions brought pursuant to this section shall be in the name of the District of Columbia upon information filed in the Superior Court by the Corporation Counsel.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-186, § 22, 35 DCR 8250
This section is referenced in § 32-1122.
1981 Ed., § 36-1221.
Section effective: Section 26 (a) of D.C. Law 7-186 (§ 32-1124(a)) provided that §§ 36-1202, 36-1203, 36-1205 to 36-1223 (§§ 32-1102, 32-1103, 32-1105 to 32-1123, 2001 Ed.), and the repeal of subchapter II of Chapter 2 of Title 36 (Chapter 8 of Title 32, 2001 Ed.) shall apply 2 years after approval of the plan by the Secretary.